Utah statutes.
77-28b-1.   Definitions.

(1)  "Assurance" means a special condition concerning the confinement or release of an offender which must be met prior to the release of the offender.

(2)  "Offender" means a juvenile certified to be tried as an adult or an adult convicted of any criminal offense under Utah law.

(3)  "Receiving country" means the jurisdiction to which the offender is to be transferred.

(4)  "Sending state" means the jurisdiction from which the offender is to be transferred.

